Hawaii statutes.
§88-6
Payment of refunds and retirement benefits. (a) Notwithstanding any
other provision of this chapter:

(1) All retirees and beneficiaries of the state
retirement system or county pension funds shall be paid semimonthly; provided
that:

(A) All retirees and beneficiaries of the
state retirement system who either retire or become beneficiaries after January
1, 2003, shall be paid monthly; and

(B) Effective July 1, 2011, all retirees and
beneficiaries of the state retirement system shall be paid monthly; provided
that this subparagraph shall not apply to any retiree or beneficiary who:

(i) Became a retiree or beneficiary prior to
January 1, 2003;

(ii) Is eighty years of age or older on January
1, 2011; and

(iii) Receives $800 or less of pension benefits
each month; and

(2) Any retiree or beneficiary of the state
retirement system whose benefit commences after June 30, 2001, shall designate
a financial institution account into which the system shall be authorized to
deposit their retirement benefit; and effective April 1, 2011, all retirees and
beneficiaries of the state retirement system shall designate a financial
institution account into which the system shall be authorized to deposit their
state retirement system benefits. This method of payment may be waived by the
system.

(b) Any member, former employee, retirant, or
beneficiary to whom accumulated contributions or a hypothetical account
balance, as defined in section 88-311, is payable after June 30, 2008, shall,
if the payment will be greater than $250 and the member, former employee,
retirant, or beneficiary does not elect to rollover the payment into an
eligible retirement plan, designate a financial institution account into which
the system shall be authorized to deposit the payment. This method of payment
may be waived by the system if another method is determined to be more
appropriate. [L 1967, c 98, §1; HRS §88-6; am L 1969, c 110, pt of §1; am L
2001, c 102, §1; am L 2002, c 128, §2; am L 2008, c 41, §2; am L 2010, c 94, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next